Florida, session 2026, SB654.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 154 155 Section 1.âSubsection (6) of section 28.37, Florida 156 Statutes, is amended to read: 157 28.37âFines, fees, service charges, and costs remitted to 158 the state.â 159 (6)âTen percent of all court-related fines collected by the 160 clerk, except for penalties or fines distributed to counties or 161 municipalities under s. 316.0083(1)(b)3. or s. 318.18(16)(a), 162 must be deposited into the fine and forfeiture fund to be used 163 exclusively for clerk court-related functions, as provided in s. 164 28.35(3)(a). 165 Section 2.âSubsections (38) and (84) of section 316.003, 166 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 167 316.003âDefinitions.âThe following words and phrases, when 168 used in this chapter, shall have the meanings respectively 169 ascribed to them in this section, except where the context 170 otherwise requires: 171 (38)âLOCAL HEARING OFFICER.âThe person, designated by a 172 department, county, or municipality, or school district that 173 elects to authorize traffic infraction enforcement officers to 174 issue traffic citations under s. 316.0083(1)(a), s. 175 316.173(1)(f), or s. 316.1896(1) ss. 316.0083(1)(a) and 176 316.1896(1), who is authorized to conduct hearings related to a 177 notice of violation issued pursuant to s. 316.0083, s. 316.173, 178 or s. 316.1896. A The charter county, noncharter county, or 179 municipality may use its currently appointed code enforcement 180 board or special magistrate to serve as the local hearing 181 officer. A school district may appoint an attorney who is, and 182 has been for the preceding 5 years, a member in good standing of 183 The Florida Bar to serve as the local hearing officer or may 184 enter into an interlocal agreement to use the local hearing 185 officer of the county. The department may enter into an 186 interlocal agreement to use the local hearing officer of a 187 county or municipality. 188 (84)âSPEED DETECTION SYSTEM.âA portable or fixed automated 189 system used to detect a motor vehicleâs speed using radar or 190 LiDAR and to capture a photograph or video of the rear of a 191 motor vehicle that exceeds the speed limit in a school zone 192 during the times listed in s. 316.1895(5) force at the time of 193 the violation. 194 Section 3.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (9) of 195 section 316.008, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 196 316.008âPowers of local authorities.â 197 (9)(a)âA county or municipality may enforce the applicable 198 speed limit on a roadway properly maintained as a school zone 199 pursuant to s. 316.1895 during the times listed in s. 200 316.1895(5): 201 1.âWithin 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the 202 start of a regularly scheduled breakfast program; 203 2.âWithin 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the 204 start of a regularly scheduled school session; 205 3.âDuring the entirety of a regularly scheduled school 206 session; and 207 4.âWithin 30 minutes before through 30 minutes after the 208 end of a regularly scheduled school session 209 210 through the use of a speed detection system for the detection of 211 speed and capturing of photographs or videos for violations in 212 excess of 10 miles per hour over the school zone speed limit in 213 force at the time of the violation. A school zoneâs compliance 214 with s. 316.1895 creates a rebuttable presumption that the 215 school zone is properly maintained. The school zone speed limit 216 may not be enforced through the use of a speed detection system 217 if any flashing beacon used to provide notice of the times 218 during which a restrictive school speed limit is being enforced 219 in the school zone is not activated at the time of the 220 violation. 221 (b)âA county or municipality may place or install, or 222 contract with a vendor to place or install, a speed detection 223 system within a roadway maintained as a school zone as provided 224 in s. 316.1895 to enforce school zone unlawful speed limit 225 violations, as specified in s. 316.1895(10), which are in excess 226 of 10 miles per hour over the school zone speed limit or s. 227 316.183, on that roadway. 228 Section 4.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) and subsections 229 (2), (4), and (5) of section 316.0083, Florida Statutes, are 230 amended, and subsection (6) is added to that section, to read: 231 316.0083âMark Wandall Traffic Safety Program; 232 administration; report.â 233 (1)(a)âFor purposes of administering this section, the 234 department, a county, or a municipality may authorize a traffic 235 infraction enforcement officer under s. 316.640 to issue a 236 traffic citation for a violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 237 316.075(1)(c)1. A notice of violation and a traffic citation may 238 not be issued for failure to stop at a red light if the driver 239 is making a right-hand turn in a careful and prudent manner at 240 an intersection where right-hand turns are permissible. A notice 241 of violation and a traffic citation may not be issued under this 242 section if the driver of the vehicle came to a complete stop 243 after crossing the stop line and before turning right if 244 permissible at a red light, but failed to stop before crossing 245 over the stop line or other point at which a stop is required. 246 This paragraph does not prohibit a review of information from a 247 traffic infraction detector by an authorized employee or agent 248 of the department, a county, or a municipality before issuance 249 of the traffic citation by the traffic infraction enforcement 250 officer. This paragraph does not prohibit the department, a 251 county, or a municipality from issuing notification as provided 252 in paragraph (b) to the registered owner of the motor vehicle 253 involved in the violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. 254 (2)âA notice of violation and a traffic citation may not be 255 issued under this section for failure to stop at a red light if 256 the driver is making a right-hand turn in a careful and prudent 257 manner at an intersection where right-hand turns are 258 permissible. For purposes of this subsection, the term âcareful 259 and prudent mannerâ means that the driver made a right-hand turn 260 after coming to a complete stop and, in the traffic enforcement 261 officerâs determination, failed to yield to a pedestrian or 262 bicyclist or placed a pedestrian or bicyclist in danger of 263 injury as a result of the right-hand turn, failed to yield to 264 another vehicle, or did not substantially reduce the speed of 265 the motor vehicle before making the right-hand turn. 266 (4)(a)1.âA county or municipality that desires to have one 267 or more traffic infraction detectors placed or installed on or 268 after July 1, 2025, in an area where no traffic infraction 269 detectors are currently placed or installed must enact an 270 ordinance in order to authorize the placement or installation 271 of, or to authorize contracting with a vendor for the placement 272 or installation of, one or more traffic infraction detectors to 273 enforce s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. As part of the 274 public hearing on such proposed ordinance, the county or 275 municipality must consider traffic data or other evidence 276 supporting the installation and operation of each traffic 277 infraction detector, and the county or municipality must 278 determine that the intersection at which a traffic infraction 279 detector is to be placed or installed constitutes a heightened 280 safety risk that warrants additional enforcement measures. 281 2.âA county or municipality that operates one or more 282 traffic infraction detectors must annually report the results of 283 all traffic infraction detectors within the countyâs or 284 municipalityâs jurisdiction by placing the annual report to the 285 department required under paragraph (b) as a single reporting 286 item on the agenda of a regular or special meeting of the 287 countyâs or municipalityâs governing body. Before a county or 288 municipality contracts or renews a contract to place or install 289 one or more traffic infraction detectors, the county or 290 municipality must approve the contract or contract renewal at a 291 regular or special meeting of the countyâs or municipalityâs 292 governing body. 293 a.âInterested members of the public must be allowed to 294 comment regarding the report, contract, or contract renewal 295 under the countyâs or municipalityâs public comment policies or 296 procedures formats, and the report, contract, or contract 297 renewal may not be considered as part of a consent agenda. 298 b.âThe report required under this subparagraph must include 299 a written summary, which must be read aloud at the regular or 300 special meeting, and the summary must contain, for the same time 301 period pertaining to the annual report to the department 302 required under paragraph (b), the number of notices of violation 303 issued, the number that were contested, the number that were 304 upheld, the number that were dismissed, the number that were 305 issued as uniform traffic citations, and the number that were 306 paid and how collected funds were distributed and in what 307 amounts. The county or municipality must report to the 308 department that the countyâs or municipalityâs annual report was 309 considered in accordance with this subparagraph, including the 310 date of the regular or special meeting at which the annual 311 report was considered. 312 3.âThe compliance or sufficiency of compliance with this 313 paragraph may not be raised in a proceeding challenging a 314 violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. enforced by a 315 traffic infraction detector. 316 4.âA county or municipality that does not comply with this 317 paragraph may not operate is suspended from operating traffic 318 infraction detectors under this subsection until such 319 noncompliance is corrected. 320 (b)âEach county or municipality that operates a traffic 321 infraction detector shall submit a report by October 1, 322 annually, to the department which details the results of using 323 the traffic infraction detector and the procedures for 324 enforcement for the preceding state fiscal year. The information 325 submitted by the counties and municipalities must include: 326 1.âThe number of notices of violation issued, the number 327 that were contested, the number that were upheld, the number 328 that were dismissed, the number that were issued as uniform 329 traffic citations, the number that were paid, and the number in 330 each of the preceding categories for which the notice of 331 violation was issued for a right-hand turn violation. 332 2.âA description of alternative safety countermeasures 333 taken before and after the placement or installation of a 334 traffic infraction detector. 335 3.âStatistical data and information required by the 336 department to complete the summary report required under 337 paragraph (d) (c). 338 339 The department shall must publish on its website each report 340 submitted by a county or municipality pursuant to this paragraph 341 on its website. 342 (c)âEach county or municipality that operates a traffic 343 infraction detector is responsible for and shall maintain its 344 respective data for reporting purposes under this subsection for 345 at least 2 years after such data is reported to the department. 346 (d)âOn or before December 31, annually, the department 347 shall provide a summary report to the Governor, the President of 348 the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 349 regarding the use and operation of traffic infraction detectors 350 under this section, along with the departmentâs recommendations 351 and any recommended necessary legislation. The summary report 352 must include a review of the information submitted to the 353 department by the counties and municipalities and must describe 354 the enhancement of the traffic safety and enforcement programs. 355 (5)âProcedures for a hearing under this section are as 356 follows: 357 (a)âThe department shall publish and make available 358 electronically to each county and municipality a model Request 359 for Hearing form to assist each county and municipality local 360 government administering this section. 361 (b)âThe charter county, noncharter county, or municipality 362 electing to authorize traffic infraction enforcement officers to 363 issue traffic citations under paragraph (1)(a) shall designate 364 by resolution existing staff to serve as the clerk to the local 365 hearing officer. 366 (c)âAny person, herein referred to as the âpetitioner,â who 367 elects to request a hearing under paragraph (1)(b) must shall be 368 scheduled for a hearing. The hearing may be conducted either 369 virtually through live video conferencing or in person. The 370 clerk to the local hearing officer shall provide the petitioner 371 with notice of the hearing, including the option for a virtual 372 or in-person hearing, which must by the clerk to the local 373 hearing officer to appear before a local hearing officer with 374 notice to be sent by first-class mail. Upon receipt of the 375 notice, the petitioner may reschedule the hearing up to two 376 times once by submitting a written request to reschedule to the 377 clerk to the local hearing officer, at least 5 calendar days 378 before the day of the originally scheduled hearing. The 379 petitioner may cancel his or her appearance before the local 380 hearing officer by paying the penalty assessed under paragraph 381 (1)(b), plus $50 in administrative costs, before the start of 382 the hearing. 383 (6)(a)1.âA traffic infraction detector may not be used for 384 remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a traffic 385 infraction detector to enforce violations of s. 316.074(1) or s. 386 316.075(1)(c)1. does not constitute remote surveillance. 387 2.âVideo and images recorded by a traffic infraction 388 detector may be used only for the enforcement of violations of 389 s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. and for purposes of 390 determining criminal or civil liability captured by the traffic 391 infraction detector incidental to the permissible use of a 392 traffic infraction detector. 393 3.âTo the extent practicable, a traffic infraction detector 394 must use necessary technology to ensure that personal 395 identifying information contained in the video and images 396 recorded by the traffic infraction detector which is not 397 relevant to the alleged violation is sufficiently obscured so as 398 to not reveal such personal identifying information. 399 4.âA notice of violation or a uniform traffic citation 400 issued under this section may not be dismissed solely because 401 the recorded video or images reveal personal identifying 402 information as provided in subparagraph 3. as long as a 403 reasonable effort has been made to comply with this subsection. 404 (b)âAny recorded video or image obtained through the use of 405 a traffic infraction detector must be destroyed within 90 days 406 after the final disposition of the recorded event. The vendor of 407 the traffic infraction detector must provide the county or 408 municipality with written notice by December 31 of each year 409 that such records have been destroyed in accordance with this 410 paragraph. 411 (c)âNotwithstanding any other law, motor vehicle 412 registration and owner information obtained as the result of the 413 operation of a traffic infraction detector is not the property 414 of the manufacturer or vendor of the traffic infraction detector 415 and may be used only for purposes authorized in this section. 416 Section 5.âSection 316.00831, Florida Statutes, is 417 repealed. 418 Section 6.âSection 316.07456, Florida Statutes, is amended 419 to read: 420 316.07456âTraffic infraction detectors; specifications 421 Transitional implementation.âAny traffic infraction detector 422 deployed on the highways, streets, and roads of this state must 423 meet specifications established by the Department of 424 Transportation, and must be tested at regular intervals 425 according to specifications prescribed by the Department of 426 Transportation. The Department of Transportation must establish 427 such specifications on or before December 31, 2010. However, any 428 such equipment acquired by purchase, lease, or other arrangement 429 under an agreement entered into by a county or municipality on 430 or before July 1, 2011, or equipment used to enforce an 431 ordinance enacted by a county or municipality on or before July 432 1, 2011, is not required to meet the specifications established 433 by the Department of Transportation until July 1, 2011. 434 Section 7.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) and subsection 435 (3) of section 316.0776, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 436 316.0776âTraffic infraction detectors; speed detection 437 systems; placement and installation.â 438 (2) 439 (b)âIf the department, county, or municipality begins a 440 traffic infraction detector program in a county or municipality 441 that has never conducted such a program, the respective 442 department, county, or municipality must shall also make a 443 public announcement and conduct a public awareness campaign of 444 the proposed use of traffic infraction detectors at least 30 445 days before commencing the enforcement program. During the 30 446 day public awareness campaign, only a warning may be issued to 447 the registered owner of a motor vehicle for a violation of s. 448 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. enforced by a traffic 449 infraction detector, and a penalty may not be imposed pursuant 450 to s. 318.18(16)(a)2. or 3. 451 (3)âA speed detection system authorized by s. 316.008(9) 452 may be placed or installed in a school zone on a state road when 453 permitted by the Department of Transportation and in accordance 454 with placement and installation specifications developed by the 455 Department of Transportation. The speed detection system may be 456 placed or installed in a school zone on a street or highway 457 under the jurisdiction of a county or a municipality in 458 accordance with placement and installation specifications 459 established by the Department of Transportation. The Department 460 of Transportation must establish such placement and installation 461 specifications by December 31, 2023. 462 (a)âIf a county or municipality places or installs a speed 463 detection system as authorized by s. 316.008(9), the county or 464 municipality must notify the public that a speed detection 465 system may be in use by posting signage indicating photographic 466 or video enforcement of the school zone speed limits. Such 467 signage must shall clearly designate the time period during 468 which the school zone speed limits are enforced using a speed 469 detection system and must meet the placement and installation 470 specifications established by the Department of Transportation. 471 For a speed detection system enforcing violations of s. 316.1895 472 or s. 316.183 on a roadway maintained as a school zone, this 473 paragraph governs the signage notifying the public of the use of 474 a speed detection system. 475 (b)âIf a county or municipality begins a school zone speed 476 detection system program in a county or municipality that has 477 never conducted such a program, the respective county or 478 municipality must make a public announcement and conduct a 479 public awareness campaign of the proposed use of speed detection 480 systems at least 30 days before commencing enforcement under the 481 speed detection system program and must notify the public of the 482 specific date on which the program will commence. During the 30 483 day public awareness campaign, only a warning may be issued to 484 the registered owner of a motor vehicle for a violation of s. 485 316.1895 or s. 316.183 enforced by a speed detection system, and 486 liability may not be imposed for the civil penalty under s. 487 318.18(3)(d). 488 (c)âA county or municipality that operates one or more 489 school zone speed detection systems shall must annually report 490 the results of all systems within the countyâs or municipalityâs 491 jurisdiction by placing the report required under s. 492 316.1896(16)(a) as a single reporting item on the agenda of a 493 regular or special meeting of the countyâs or municipalityâs 494 governing body. Before a county or municipality contracts or 495 renews a contract to place or install a speed detection system 496 in a school zone pursuant to s. 316.008(9), the county or 497 municipality must approve the contract or contract renewal at a 498 regular or special meeting of the countyâs or municipalityâs 499 governing body. 500 1.âInterested members of the public must be allowed to 501 comment regarding the report, contract, or contract renewal 502 under the countyâs or municipalityâs public comment policies or 503 procedures formats, and the report, contract, or contract 504 renewal may not be considered as part of a consent agenda. 505 2.âThe report required under this paragraph must include a 506 written summary, which must be read aloud at the regular or 507 special meeting, and the summary must contain, for the same time 508 period pertaining to the annual report to the department under 509 s. 316.1896(16)(a), the number of notices of violation issued, 510 the number that were contested, the number that were upheld, the 511 number that were dismissed, the number that were issued as 512 uniform traffic citations, and the number that were paid and how 513 collected funds were distributed and in what amounts. The county 514 or municipality shall must report to the department that the 515 countyâs or municipalityâs annual report was considered in 516 accordance with this paragraph, including the date of the 517 regular or special meeting at which the annual report was 518 considered. 519 3.âThe compliance or sufficiency of compliance with this 520 paragraph may not be raised in a proceeding challenging a 521 violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 enforced by a speed 522 detection system in a school zone. 523 4.âA county or municipality that does not comply with this 524 paragraph may not operate a speed detection system under this 525 section until such noncompliance is corrected. 526 Section 8.âSubsection (1), paragraph (c) of subsection (2), 527 subsections (4) and (6), paragraph (a) of subsection (17), and 528 subsections (18) and (19) of section 316.173, Florida Statutes, 529 are amended to read: 530 316.173âSchool bus infraction detection systems.â 531 (1)(a)âA school district may install and operate a school 532 bus infraction detection system on a school bus for the purpose 533 of enforcing s. 316.172(1)(a) and (b) as provided in and 534 consistent with this section. 535 (b)âA school district that desires to install one or more 536 school bus infraction detection systems on school buses in its 537 fleet must have specific authorization from the district school 538 board to place or install, or contract with a vendor to install, 539 operate, and maintain, school bus infraction detection systems 540 to enforce s. 316.172(1)(a) and (b). As part of a public hearing 541 held by the school board on such authorization, the school board 542 shall consider traffic data or other evidence supporting the 543 installation and operation of each school bus infraction 544 detection system, and the school board shall determine whether 545 the school bus route for which school bus infraction detection 546 systems are to be placed or installed constitutes a heightened 547 safety risk that warrants additional enforcement measures. 548 Interested members of the public must be allowed to comment 549 regarding a contract or renewal of a contract for the 550 installation, operation, and maintenance of school bus 551 infraction detection systems under the school boardâs public 552 comment policies or procedures, and the contract or contract 553 renewal may not be considered as part of a consent agenda. 554 (c)âAfter an affirmative vote from the school board 555 authorizing such a contract, the school district may enter into 556 a contract with a private vendor or manufacturer to install a 557 school bus infraction detection system on any school bus in 558 within its fleet, whether owned, contracted, or leased, and for 559 services including, but not limited to, the installation, 560 operation, and maintenance of the system. The school districtâs 561 decision to install school bus infraction detection systems must 562 be based solely on the need to increase public safety. An 563 individual may not receive a commission from any revenue 564 collected from violations detected through the use of a school 565 bus infraction detection system. A private vendor or 566 manufacturer may not receive a fee or remuneration based upon 567 the number of violations detected through the use of a school 568 bus infraction detection system. This paragraph may not be 569 construed to prohibit a private vendor or manufacturer from 570 receiving a fixed amount of collected proceeds for service 571 rendered in relation to the installation, operation, or 572 maintenance of school bus infraction detection systems. 573 (d)(c)âThe school district shall must ensure that each 574 school bus infraction detection system meets the requirements of 575 subsection (19). 576 (e)(d)âThe school district must enter into an interlocal 577 agreement with one or more law enforcement agencies authorized 578 to enforce violations of s. 316.172(1)(a) and (b) within the 579 school district which jointly establishes the responsibilities 580 of enforcement and the reimbursement of costs associated with 581 school bus infraction detection systems consistent with this 582 section. For school bus infraction detection system programs 583 established after October 1, 2026, the school district must 584 enter into an interlocal agreement before beginning its school 585 bus infraction detection system program. 586 (f)âFor purposes of administering this section, a law 587 enforcement agency may authorize a traffic infraction 588 enforcement officer under s. 316.640 to issue uniform traffic 589 citations for violations of s. 316.172(1)(a) and (b). This 590 paragraph does not prohibit the review of information from a 591 school bus infraction detection system by an authorized employee 592 or agent of the school district or law enforcement agency before 593 issuance of the traffic citation by the traffic infraction 594 enforcement officer. This paragraph does not prohibit the law 595 enforcement agency or its designee from issuing a notification 596 as provided in subsection (5) to the registered owner of the 597 motor vehicle involved in the violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or 598 (b). 599 (2) 600 (c)âThe sufficiency of signage or compliance with the 601 signage requirements under this subsection may not be raised in 602 a proceeding challenging a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b). 603 (4)âWithin 30 days after an alleged violation of s. 604 316.172(1)(a) or (b) is recorded by a school bus infraction 605 detection system, the school district or the private vendor or 606 manufacturer under paragraph (1)(c) (1)(b) must submit the 607 following information to a law enforcement agency that has 608 entered into an interlocal agreement with the school district 609 pursuant to paragraph (1)(e) (1)(d) and has traffic infraction 610 enforcement jurisdiction at the location where the alleged 611 violation occurred: 612 (a)âA copy of the recorded video and images showing the 613 motor vehicle allegedly violating s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b). 614 (b)âThe motor vehicleâs license plate number and the state 615 of issuance of the motor vehicleâs license plate. 616 (c)âThe date, time, and location of the alleged violation. 617 (6)(a)âA local hearing officer appointed by the school 618 district or county shall administer a an administrative hearing 619 process for a contested notice of violation. The school district 620 may appoint an attorney who is, and has been for the preceding 5 621 years, a member in good standing with The Florida Bar to serve 622 as a local hearing officer. The county in which a school 623 district has entered into an interlocal agreement with a law 624 enforcement agency to issue uniform traffic citations may 625 designate by resolution existing staff to serve as clerk to the 626 local hearing officer. At the administrative hearing, the local 627 hearing officer shall determine whether a violation of s. 628 316.172(1)(a) or (b) has occurred. If the local hearing officer 629 finds by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation has 630 occurred, the local hearing officer must uphold the notice of 631 violation and require the petitioner to pay the penalty 632 previously assessed under s. 318.18(5). The local hearing 633 officer may shall also require the petitioner to pay costs 634 consistent with this subsection. 635 (b)âProcedures for a an administrative hearing conducted 636 under this subsection are as follows: 637 1.âThe department shall make available electronically to 638 the school district or its designee or the county a Request for 639 Hearing form to assist each district or county with 640 administering this subsection. 641 2.âA person, referred to in this paragraph as the 642 petitioner, who elects to request a hearing under this 643 subsection must shall be scheduled for a hearing. The hearing 644 may be conducted either virtually through via live video 645 conferencing or in person. 646 3.âThe clerk to the local hearing officer shall provide the 647 petitioner with notice of the hearing, including the option for 648 a virtual or in-person hearing, which must be sent Within 120 649 days after receipt of a timely request for a hearing, the law 650 enforcement agency or its designee shall provide a replica of 651 the notice of violation data to the school district or county by 652 manual or electronic transmission, and thereafter the school 653 district or its designee or the county shall mail a notice of 654 hearing, which shall include a hearing date and may at the 655 discretion of the district or county include virtual and in 656 person hearing options, to the petitioner by first-class mail. 657 Mailing of the notice of hearing constitutes notification. Upon 658 receipt of the notice of hearing, the petitioner may reschedule 659 the hearing up to two times once by submitting a written request 660 to the local hearing officer at least 5 calendar days before the 661 day of the originally scheduled hearing. The petitioner may 662 cancel his or her hearing by paying the penalty assessed in the 663 notice of violation and any costs authorized in s. 664 316.0083(5)(c) before the start of the hearing. 665 4.âAll testimony at the hearing must shall be under oath 666 and recorded. The local hearing officer shall take testimony 667 from a representative of the law enforcement agency and the 668 petitioner, and may take testimony from others. The local 669 hearing officer shall review the video and images recorded by a 670 school bus infraction detection system. Formal rules of evidence 671 do not apply, but due process shall be observed and govern the 672 proceedings. 673 5.âAt the conclusion of the hearing, the local hearing 674 officer shall determine by a preponderance of the evidence 675 whether a violation has occurred and shall uphold or dismiss the 676 violation. The local hearing officer shall issue a final 677 administrative order including the determination and, if the 678 notice of violation is upheld, must require the petitioner to 679 pay the civil penalty previously assessed in the notice of 680 violation, and may shall also require the petitioner to pay 681 costs, not to exceed those established in s. 316.0083(5)(e), to 682 be used by the county for operational costs relating to the 683 hearing process or by the school district for technology and 684 operational costs relating to the hearing process as well as 685 school transportation safety-related initiatives. The final 686 administrative order must shall be mailed to the petitioner by 687 first-class mail. 688 6.âAn aggrieved party may appeal a final administrative 689 order consistent with the process provided in s. 162.11. 690 (c)âAny hearing for a contested notice of violation that 691 has not been conducted before July 1, 2025, may be conducted 692 pursuant to the procedures in this subsection within 1 year 693 after such date. 694 (17)(a)1.âA school bus infraction detection system may not 695 be used for remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a 696 school bus infraction detection system to enforce violations of 697 s. 316.172 does not constitute remote surveillance. 698 2.âVideo and images recorded as part of a school bus 699 infraction detection system may only be used for traffic 700 enforcement and for purposes of determining criminal or civil 701 liability for incidents captured by the school bus infraction 702 detection system incidental to the permissible use of the school 703 bus infraction detection system. 704 3.âTo the extent practicable, a school bus infraction 705 detection system must use necessary technology to ensure that 706 personal identifying information contained in the video or still 707 images recorded by the system which is not relevant to the 708 alleged violation, including, but not limited to, the identity 709 of the driver and any passenger of a motor vehicle, the interior 710 or contents of a motor vehicle, the identity of an uninvolved 711 person, a number identifying the address of a private residence, 712 and the contents or interior of a private residence, is 713 sufficiently obscured so as not to reveal such personal 714 identifying information. 715 4.âA notice of a violation or uniform traffic citation 716 issued under this section may not be dismissed solely because a 717 recorded video or still images reveal personal identifying 718 information as provided in subparagraph 3. as long as a 719 reasonable effort has been made to comply with this subsection. 720 (18)(a)1.âA school district that operates one or more 721 school bus infraction detection systems shall annually report 722 the results of all such systems operated within the school 723 district by placing the annual report to the department required 724 under paragraph (b) as a single reporting item on the agenda of 725 a regular or special meeting of the school board. 726 2.âInterested members of the public must be allowed to 727 comment regarding the report under the school boardâs public 728 comment policies or procedures, and the report may not be 729 considered as part of a consent agenda. 730 3.âThe report required under this paragraph must include a 731 written summary, which must be read aloud at the regular or 732 special meeting, and the summary must contain, for the same time 733 period as the annual report to the department under paragraph 734 (b), the number of school buses that have a school bus 735 infraction detection system installed, including the date of 736 installation and, if applicable, the date the systems were 737 removed; the number of notices of violations issued and the 738 number that were contested, the number that were upheld, the 739 number that were dismissed, the number that were issued as 740 uniform traffic citations, and the number that were paid; and 741 the manner in which collected funds were distributed and in what 742 amounts. 743 4.âThe compliance or sufficiency of compliance with this 744 paragraph may not be raised in a proceeding challenging a 745 violation of s. 316.172(a) or (b) enforced by a school bus 746 infraction detection system. 747 5.âA school district that does not comply with this 748 paragraph may not operate school bus infraction detection 749 systems under this section until such noncompliance is 750 corrected. 751 (b)âBy October 1, annually 2023, and quarterly thereafter, 752 each school district operating a school bus infraction detection 753 system shall must submit, in consultation with the law 754 enforcement agencies with which it has interlocal agreements 755 pursuant to this section, a report to the department which 756 details the results of the school bus infraction detection 757 systems in the school district during the preceding state fiscal 758 year in the preceding quarter. The information from the school 759 districts must be submitted in a form and manner determined by 760 the department, which the department must make available to the 761 school districts by August 1, 2023, and must include at least 762 the following: 763 1.âThe number of school buses that have a school bus 764 infraction detection system installed, including the date of 765 installation and, if applicable, the date the systems were 766 removed. 767 2.âThe number of notices of violations issued, the number 768 that were contested, the number that were upheld, the number 769 that were dismissed, the number that were issued as uniform 770 traffic citations, and the number that were paid. 771 3.âData for each infraction to determine locations in need 772 of safety improvements. Such data may include, but is not 773 limited to, global positioning system coordinates of the 774 infraction, the date and time of the infraction, and the name of 775 the school that the school bus was transporting students to or 776 from. 777 4.âAny other statistical data and information required by 778 the department to complete the report required by paragraph (c). 779 780 The department shall publish on its website each report 781 submitted by a school district pursuant to this paragraph. 782 (c)(b)âEach school district that operates a school bus 783 infraction detection system is responsible for and shall must 784 maintain its respective data for reporting purposes under this 785 subsection for at least 2 years after such data is reported to 786 the department. 787 (d)(c)âOn or before December 31, 2024, and annually 788 thereafter, the department shall submit a summary report to the 789 Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the 790 House of Representatives regarding the use and operation of 791 school bus infraction detection systems under this section, 792 along with the departmentâs recommendations and any recommended 793 legislation. The summary report must include a review of the 794 information submitted to the department by the school districts 795 and must describe the enhancement of traffic safety and 796 enforcement programs. 797 (19)âA school bus infraction detection system must meet 798 specifications established by the State Board of Education and 799 must be tested at regular intervals according to specifications 800 prescribed by state board rule. The state board must establish 801 such specifications by rule on or before December 31, 2023. 802 However, any such equipment acquired by purchase, lease, or 803 other arrangement under an agreement entered into by a school 804 district on or before December 31, 2023, is not required to meet 805 the specifications established by the state board until July 1, 806 2024. 807 Section 9.âSubsection (1), paragraphs (b) and (c) of 808 subsection (2), subsections (3), (5) through (9), (12), and 809 (13), paragraph (c) of subsection (14), paragraph (a) of 810 subsection (15), and paragraphs (a) and (c) of subsection (16) 811 of section 316.1896, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 812 316.1896âRoadways maintained as school zones; speed 813 detection system enforcement; penalties; appeal procedure; 814 privacy; reports.â 815 (1)âFor purposes of administering this section, a county or 816 municipality may authorize a traffic infraction enforcement 817 officer under s. 316.640 to issue uniform traffic citations for 818 violations of s. 316.1895 during the times listed in s. 819 316.1895(5) ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 as authorized by s. 820 316.008(9), as follows: 821 (a)âFor a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles 822 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30 823 minutes before through 30 minutes after the start of a regularly 824 scheduled breakfast program. 825 (b)âFor a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles 826 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30 827 minutes before through 30 minutes after the start of a regularly 828 scheduled school session. 829 (c)âFor a violation of s. 316.183 in excess of 10 miles per 830 hour over the posted speed limit during the entirety of a 831 regularly scheduled school session. 832 (d)âFor a violation of s. 316.1895 in excess of 10 miles 833 per hour over the school zone speed limit which occurs within 30 834 minutes before through 30 minutes after the end of a regularly 835 scheduled school session. 836 837 Such violation must be evidenced by a speed detection system 838 described in ss. 316.008(9) and 316.0776(3). This subsection 839 does not prohibit a review of information from a speed detection 840 system by an authorized employee or agent of a county or 841 municipality before issuance of the uniform traffic citation by 842 the traffic infraction enforcement officer. This subsection does 843 not prohibit a county or municipality from issuing notices as 844 provided in subsection (2) to the registered owner of the motor 845 vehicle for a violation of s. 316.1895. The school zone speed 846 limit may not be enforced through the use of a speed detection 847 system if any flashing beacon used to provide notice of the 848 times during which a restrictive school speed limit is being 849 enforced in the school zone is not activated at the time of the 850 violation or s. 316.183. 851 (2)âWithin 30 days after a violation, notice must be sent 852 to the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the 853 violation specifying the remedies available under s. 318.14 and 854 that the violator must pay the penalty under s. 318.18(3)(d) to 855 the county or municipality, or furnish an affidavit in 856 accordance with subsection (8), within 30 days after the date of 857 the notice of violation in order to avoid court fees, costs, and 858 the issuance of a uniform traffic citation. The notice of 859 violation must: 860 (b)âInclude a photograph or other recorded image showing 861 the license plate of the motor vehicle; the date, time, and 862 location of the violation; the maximum speed at which the motor 863 vehicle was traveling within the school zone; and the speed 864 limit within the school zone at the time of the violation. 865 (c)âInclude a notice that the owner has the right to 866 review, in person or remotely, the photograph or video captured 867 by the speed detection system and the evidence of the speed of 868 the motor vehicle detected by the speed detection system which 869 constitute a rebuttable presumption that the motor vehicle was 870 used in violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183. 871 (3)âNotwithstanding any other law, a person who receives a 872 notice of violation under this section may request a hearing 873 within 60 30 days after the notice of violation or may pay the 874 penalty pursuant to the notice of violation, but a payment or 875 fee may not be required before the hearing requested by the 876 person. The notice of violation must be accompanied by, or 877 direct the person to a website that provides, information on the 878 personâs right to request a hearing and on all costs related 879 thereto and a form used for requesting a hearing. As used in 880 this subsection, the term âpersonâ includes a natural person, 881 the registered owner or co-owner of a motor vehicle, or the 882 person identified in an affidavit as having actual care, 883 custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the 884 violation. 885 (5)âPenalties assessed and collected by the county or 886 municipality authorized to collect the funds provided for in 887 this section, less the amount retained by the county or 888 municipality pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (e) paragraph (b) 889 and paragraph (e) and the amount remitted to the county school 890 district pursuant to paragraph (d), must be paid to the 891 Department of Revenue weekly. Such payment must be made by means 892 of electronic funds transfer. In addition to the payment, a 893 detailed summary of the penalties remitted must be reported to 894 the Department of Revenue. Penalties to be assessed and 895 collected by the county or municipality as established in s. 896 318.18(3)(d) must be remitted as follows: 897 (a)âTwenty dollars must be remitted to the Department of 898 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 899 (b)âSixty dollars must be retained by the county or 900 municipality and must be used to administer speed detection 901 systems in school zones and other public safety initiatives. 902 (c)âThree dollars must be remitted to the Department of 903 Revenue for deposit into the Department of Law Enforcement 904 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Trust Fund. 905 (d)âTwelve dollars must be remitted to the county school 906 district in which the violation occurred and must be used for 907 school security initiatives, for student transportation, or to 908 improve the safety of student walking conditions. Funds remitted 909 under this paragraph must be shared with charter schools in the 910 district based on each charter schoolâs proportionate share of 911 the districtâs total unweighted full-time equivalent student 912 enrollment and must be used for school security initiatives or 913 to improve the safety of student walking conditions. 914 (e)âFive dollars must be retained by the county or 915 municipality for the School Crossing Guard Recruitment and 916 Retention Program pursuant to s. 316.1894. 917 918 Under a school zone speed detection system contract entered into 919 or renewed on or after October 1, 2026, an individual may not 920 receive a commission or per-ticket fee from any revenue 921 collected from violations detected through the use of a speed 922 detection system. A manufacturer or vendor of speed detection 923 systems may not receive a fee or remuneration based upon the 924 number of violations detected through the use of a speed 925 detection system. 926 (6)âA uniform traffic citation must be issued by mailing 927 the uniform traffic citation by certified mail to the address of 928 the registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in the 929 violation if payment has not been made within 60 30 days after 930 notification under subsection (2), if the registered owner has 931 not requested a hearing as authorized under subsection (3), and 932 if the registered owner has not submitted an affidavit in 933 accordance with subsection (8). 934 (a)âDelivery of the uniform traffic citation constitutes 935 notification of a violation under this subsection. If the 936 registered owner or co-owner of the motor vehicle; the person 937 identified as having care, custody, or control of the motor 938 vehicle at the time of the violation; or a duly authorized 939 representative of the owner, co-owner, or identified person 940 initiates a proceeding to challenge the citation pursuant to 941 this section, such person waives any challenge or dispute as to 942 the delivery of the uniform traffic citation. 943 (b)âIn the case of joint ownership of a motor vehicle, the 944 uniform traffic citation must be mailed to the first name 945 appearing on the motor vehicle registration, unless the first 946 name appearing on the registration is a business organization, 947 in which case the second name appearing on the registration may 948 be used. 949 (c)âThe uniform traffic citation mailed to the registered 950 owner of the motor vehicle involved in the infraction must be 951 accompanied by the information described in paragraphs (2)(b) 952 (d). 953 (7)âThe registered owner of the motor vehicle involved in 954 the violation is responsible and liable for paying the uniform 955 traffic citation issued for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 956 316.183 unless the owner can establish that: 957 (a)âThe motor vehicle was, at the time of the violation, in 958 the care, custody, or control of another person; 959 (b)âA uniform traffic citation was issued by law 960 enforcement to the driver of the motor vehicle for the alleged 961 violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183; or 962 (c)âThe motor vehicleâs owner was deceased on or before the 963 date of the alleged violation, as established by an affidavit 964 submitted by the representative of the motor vehicle ownerâs 965 estate or other identified person or family member. 966 (8)âTo establish such facts under subsection (7), the 967 registered owner of the motor vehicle must, within 60 30 days 968 after the date of issuance of the notice of violation or the 969 uniform traffic citation, furnish to the appropriate 970 governmental entity an affidavit setting forth information 971 supporting an exception under subsection (7). 972 (a)âAn affidavit supporting the exception under paragraph 973 (7)(a) must include the name, address, date of birth, and, if 974 known, the driver license number of the person who leased, 975 rented, or otherwise had care, custody, or control of the motor 976 vehicle at the time of the alleged violation. If the motor 977 vehicle was stolen at the time of the alleged violation, the 978 affidavit must include the police report indicating that the 979 motor vehicle was stolen. 980 (b)âIf a uniform traffic citation for a violation of s. 981 316.1895 or s. 316.183 was issued at the location of the 982 violation by a law enforcement officer, the affidavit must 983 include the serial number of the uniform traffic citation. 984 (c)âIf the motor vehicleâs owner to whom a notice of 985 violation or a uniform traffic citation has been issued is 986 deceased, the affidavit must include a certified copy of the 987 ownerâs death certificate showing that the date of death 988 occurred on or before the date of the alleged violation and one 989 of the following: 990 1.âA bill of sale or other document showing that the 991 deceased ownerâs motor vehicle was sold or transferred after his 992 or her death but on or before the date of the alleged violation. 993 2.âDocumented proof that the registered license plate 994 belonging to the deceased ownerâs motor vehicle was returned to 995 the department or any branch office or authorized agent of the 996 department after his or her death but on or before the date of 997 the alleged violation. 998 3.âA copy of the police report showing that the deceased 999 ownerâs registered license plate or motor vehicle was stolen 1000 after his or her death but on or before the date of the alleged 1001 violation. 1002 1003 Upon receipt of the affidavit and documentation required under 1004 paragraphs (b) and (c), or 60 30 days after the date of issuance 1005 of a notice of violation sent to a person identified as having 1006 care, custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the time of 1007 the violation under paragraph (a), the county or municipality 1008 must dismiss the notice or citation and provide proof of such 1009 dismissal to the person who submitted the affidavit. If, within 1010 30 days after the date of a notice of violation sent to a person 1011 under subsection (9), the county or municipality receives an 1012 affidavit under subsection (10) from the person sent a notice of 1013 violation affirming that the person did not have care, custody, 1014 or control of the motor vehicle at the time of the violation, 1015 the county or municipality must notify the registered owner that 1016 the notice or citation will not be dismissed due to failure to 1017 establish that another person had care, custody, or control of 1018 the motor vehicle at the time of the violation. 1019 (9)âUpon receipt of an affidavit under paragraph (8)(a), 1020 the county or municipality may issue the person identified as 1021 having care, custody, or control of the motor vehicle at the 1022 time of the violation a notice of violation pursuant to 1023 subsection (2) for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183. The 1024 affidavit is admissible in a proceeding pursuant to this section 1025 for the purpose of providing evidence that the person identified 1026 in the affidavit was in actual care, custody, or control of the 1027 motor vehicle. The owner of a leased motor vehicle for which a 1028 uniform traffic citation is issued for a violation of s. 1029 316.1895 or s. 316.183 is not responsible for paying the uniform 1030 traffic citation and is not required to submit an affidavit as 1031 specified in subsection (8) if the motor vehicle involved in the 1032 violation is registered in the name of the lessee of such motor 1033 vehicle. 1034 (12)âThe photograph or video captured by a speed detection 1035 system and the evidence of the speed of the motor vehicle 1036 detected by a speed detection system which are attached to or 1037 referenced in the uniform traffic citation are evidence of a 1038 violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 and are admissible in any 1039 proceeding to enforce this section. The photograph or video and 1040 the evidence of speed detected raise a rebuttable presumption 1041 that the motor vehicle named in the report or shown in the 1042 photograph or video was used in violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 1043 316.183. 1044 (13)âThis section supplements the enforcement of s. 1045 316.1895 ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 by a law enforcement officer 1046 and does not prohibit a law enforcement officer from issuing a 1047 uniform traffic citation for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 1048 316.183. 1049 (14)âA hearing under this section must be conducted under 1050 the procedures established by s. 316.0083(5) and as follows: 1051 (c)âA person, referred to in this subsection as the 1052 âpetitioner,â who elects to request a hearing under subsection 1053 (3) must be scheduled for a hearing by the clerk to the local 1054 hearing officer. The hearing may be conducted either virtually 1055 through live video conferencing or in person. The clerk to the 1056 local hearing officer shall provide must furnish the petitioner 1057 with notice of the hearing, including the option for a virtual 1058 or in-person hearing, which must be sent by first-class mail. 1059 Upon receipt of the notice, the petitioner may reschedule the 1060 hearing up to two times by submitting a written request to 1061 reschedule to the clerk at least 5 calendar days before the day 1062 of the scheduled hearing. The petitioner may cancel his or her 1063 appearance before the local hearing officer by paying the 1064 penalty assessed under subsection (2), plus the administrative 1065 costs established in s. 316.0083(5)(c), before the start of the 1066 hearing. 1067 (15)(a)âA speed detection system in a school zone may not 1068 be used for remote surveillance. The collection of evidence by a 1069 speed detection system to enforce violations of s. 316.1895 ss. 1070 316.1895 and 316.183, or user-controlled pan or tilt adjustments 1071 of speed detection system components, do not constitute remote 1072 surveillance. Recorded video or photographs collected by as part 1073 of a speed detection system in a school zone may only be used to 1074 document violations of s. 316.1895 ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 and 1075 for purposes of determining criminal or civil liability for 1076 incidents captured by the speed detection system incidental to 1077 the permissible use of the speed detection system. 1078 (16)(a)âEach county or municipality that operates one or 1079 more speed detection systems shall must submit a report by 1080 October 1, 2024, and annually thereafter, to the department 1081 which identifies the public safety objectives used to identify a 1082 school zone for enforcement under this section, reports 1083 compliance with s. 316.0776(3)(c), and details the results of 1084 the speed detection system in the school zone during the 1085 preceding state fiscal year and the procedures for enforcement. 1086 The information from counties and municipalities must be 1087 submitted in a form and manner determined by the department, 1088 which the department must make available to the counties and 1089 municipalities by August 1, 2023, and the department may require 1090 data components to be submitted quarterly. The report must 1091 include at least the following: 1092 1.âInformation related to the location of each speed 1093 detection system, including the geocoordinates of the school 1094 zone, the directional approach of the speed detection system, 1095 the school name, the school level, the times the speed detection 1096 system was active, the restricted school zone speed limit 1097 enforced pursuant to s. 316.1895(5), the posted speed limit 1098 enforced at times other than those authorized by s. 316.1895(5), 1099 the date the systems were activated to enforce violations of s. 1100 316.1895 ss. 316.1895 and 316.183, and, if applicable, the date 1101 the systems were deactivated. 1102 2.âThe number of notices of violation issued, the number, 1103 if any, that were issued outside of the enforcement periods 1104 authorized in subsection (1), the number that were contested, 1105 the number that were upheld, the number that were dismissed, the 1106 number that were issued as uniform traffic citations, and the 1107 number that were paid. 1108 3.âAny other statistical data and information related to 1109 the procedures for enforcement which is required by the 1110 department to complete the report required under paragraph (c). 1111 1112 The department shall publish on its website each report 1113 submitted by a county or municipality pursuant to this 1114 paragraph. 1115 (c)âOn or before December 31, 2024, and annually 1116 thereafter, the department shall must submit a summary report to 1117 the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 1118 the House of Representatives regarding the use of speed 1119 detection systems under this section, along with any recommended 1120 legislation legislative recommendations from the department. The 1121 summary report must include a review of the information 1122 submitted to the department by the counties and municipalities 1123 and must describe the enhancement of safety and enforcement 1124 programs. 1125 Section 10.âParagraph (d) of subsection (1) of section 1126 316.1906, Florida Statutes, is reordered and amended, and 1127 subsection (3) of that section is amended, to read: 1128 316.1906âRadar speed-measuring devices; speed detection 1129 systems; evidence, admissibility.â 1130 (1)âDEFINITIONS.â 1131 (d)ââOfficerâ means any: 1132 2.1.ââLaw enforcement officerâ who is elected, appointed, 1133 or employed full time by any municipality or the state or any 1134 political subdivision thereof; who is vested with the authority 1135 to bear arms and make arrests; and whose primary responsibility 1136 is the prevention and detection of crime or the enforcement of 1137 the penal, criminal, traffic, or highway laws of the state; 1138 3.2.ââPart-time law enforcement officerâ who is employed or 1139 appointed less than full time, as defined by an employing 1140 agency, with or without compensation; who is vested with 1141 authority to bear arms and make arrests; and whose primary 1142 responsibility is the prevention and detection of crime or the 1143 enforcement of the penal, criminal, traffic, or highway laws of 1144 the state; or 1145 1.3.ââAuxiliary law enforcement officerâ who is employed or 1146 appointed, with or without compensation; who aids or assists a 1147 full-time or part-time law enforcement officer; and who, while 1148 under the direct supervision of a full-time or part-time law 1149 enforcement officer, has the authority to arrest and perform law 1150 enforcement functions; or 1151 4.ââTraffic infraction enforcement officerâ who is employed 1152 or appointed, with or without compensation, and satisfies the 1153 requirements of s. 316.640(5) and is vested with authority to 1154 enforce violations of s. 316.1895 ss. 316.1895 and 316.183 1155 pursuant to s. 316.1896. 1156 (3)âA speed detection system is exempt from the design 1157 requirements for radar or LiDAR units established by the 1158 department. A speed detection system must have the ability to 1159 perform self-tests as to its detection accuracy. The system must 1160 perform a self-test at least once every 30 days. The law 1161 enforcement agency, or an agent acting on behalf of the law 1162 enforcement agency, operating a speed detection system must 1163 maintain a log of the results of the systemâs self-tests. The 1164 law enforcement agency, or an agent acting on behalf of the law 1165 enforcement agency, operating a speed detection system must also 1166 perform an independent calibration test on the speed detection 1167 system at least once every 12 months. The self-test logs, as 1168 well as the results of the annual calibration test, are 1169 admissible in any court proceeding for a uniform traffic 1170 citation issued for a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 1171 enforced pursuant to s. 316.1896. Notwithstanding subsection 1172 (2), evidence of the speed of a motor vehicle detected by a 1173 speed detection system compliant with this subsection and the 1174 determination by a traffic infraction enforcement officer that a 1175 motor vehicle is operating in excess of the applicable speed 1176 limit is admissible in any proceeding with respect to an alleged 1177 violation of law regulating the speed of motor vehicles in 1178 school zones. 1179 Section 11.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 1180 316.640, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1181 316.640âEnforcement.âThe enforcement of the traffic laws of 1182 this state is vested as follows: 1183 (5)(a)âAny sheriffâs department or police department of a 1184 municipality may employ, as a traffic infraction enforcement 1185 officer, any individual who successfully completes instruction 1186 in traffic enforcement procedures and court presentation through 1187 the Selective Traffic Enforcement Program as approved by the 1188 Division of Criminal Justice Standards and Training of the 1189 Department of Law Enforcement, or through a similar program, but 1190 who does not necessarily otherwise meet the uniform minimum 1191 standards established by the Criminal Justice Standards and 1192 Training Commission for law enforcement officers or auxiliary 1193 law enforcement officers under s. 943.13. Any such traffic 1194 infraction enforcement officer who observes the commission of a 1195 traffic infraction or, in the case of a parking infraction, who 1196 observes an illegally parked vehicle may issue a traffic 1197 citation for the infraction when, based upon personal 1198 investigation, he or she has reasonable and probable grounds to 1199 believe that an offense has been committed which constitutes a 1200 noncriminal traffic infraction as defined in s. 318.14. In 1201 addition, any such traffic infraction enforcement officer may 1202 issue a traffic citation under ss. 316.0083, 316.173, and 1203 316.1896 ss. 316.0083 and 316.1896. For purposes of enforcing 1204 ss. 316.074(1), 316.075(1)(c)1., 316.172(1)(a) and (b), and 1205 316.1895(10) ss. 316.0083, 316.1895, and 316.183, any sheriffâs 1206 department or police department of a municipality may designate 1207 employees as traffic infraction enforcement officers. The 1208 traffic infraction enforcement officers must be physically 1209 located in the county of the respective sheriffâs or police 1210 department. 1211 Section 12.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 1212 316.650, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1213 316.650âTraffic citations.â 1214 (3) 1215 (c)âIf a traffic citation is issued under s. 316.0083, s. 1216 316.173, or s. 316.1896, the traffic infraction enforcement 1217 officer must shall provide by electronic transmission a replica 1218 of the traffic citation data to the court having jurisdiction 1219 over the alleged offense or its traffic violations bureau within 1220 5 business days after the date of issuance of the traffic 1221 citation to the violator. If a hearing is requested, the traffic 1222 infraction enforcement officer must shall provide a replica of 1223 the traffic notice of violation data to the clerk to for the 1224 local hearing officer having jurisdiction over the alleged 1225 offense within 14 days. 1226 Section 13.âSubsection (3) of section 318.15, Florida 1227 Statutes, is amended to read: 1228 318.15âFailure to comply with civil penalty or to appear; 1229 penalty.â 1230 (3)âThe clerk shall notify the department of persons who 1231 were mailed a notice of violation of s. 316.074(1) or s. 1232 316.075(1)(c)1. pursuant to s. 316.0083, of s. 316.172(1)(a) or 1233 (b) pursuant to s. 316.173, or of s. 316.1895(10) pursuant to s. 1234 316.1896, and who failed to enter into, or comply with the terms 1235 of, a penalty payment plan, or order with the clerk to the local 1236 hearing officer or failed to appear at a scheduled hearing 1237 within 10 days after such failure, and shall reference the 1238 personâs driver license number, or in the case of a business 1239 entity, vehicle registration number. 1240 (a)âUpon receipt of such notice, the department, or 1241 authorized agent thereof, may not issue a license plate or 1242 revalidation sticker for any motor vehicle owned or co-owned by 1243 that person pursuant to s. 320.03(8) until the amounts assessed 1244 have been fully paid. 1245 (b)âAfter the issuance of the personâs license plate or 1246 revalidation sticker is withheld pursuant to paragraph (a), the 1247 person may challenge the withholding of the license plate or 1248 revalidation sticker only on the basis that the outstanding 1249 fines and civil penalties have been paid pursuant to s. 1250 320.03(8). 1251 Section 14.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3), paragraphs (a) 1252 and (b) of subsection (5), and subsection (23) of section 1253 318.18, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1254 318.18âAmount of penalties.âThe penalties required for a 1255 noncriminal disposition pursuant to s. 318.14 or a criminal 1256 offense listed in s. 318.17 are as follows: 1257 (3) 1258 (d)1.âNotwithstanding paragraphs (b) and (c), a person 1259 cited for a violation of s. 316.1895(10) or s. 316.183 for 1260 exceeding the speed limit in force at the time of the violation 1261 on a roadway maintained as a school zone as provided in s. 1262 316.1895, when enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement 1263 officer pursuant to s. 316.1896, must pay a fine of $100. Fines 1264 collected under this paragraph must be distributed as follows: 1265 a.âTwenty dollars must be remitted to the Department of 1266 Revenue for deposit into the General Revenue Fund. 1267 b.âSeventy-seven dollars must be distributed to the county 1268 for any violations occurring in any unincorporated areas of the 1269 county or to the municipality for any violations occurring in 1270 the incorporated boundaries of the municipality in which the 1271 infraction occurred, to be used as provided in s. 316.1896(5). 1272 c.âThree dollars must be remitted to the Department of 1273 Revenue for deposit into the Department of Law Enforcement 1274 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Trust Fund to be used as 1275 provided in s. 943.25. 1276 2.âIf a person who is mailed a notice of violation or a 1277 uniform traffic citation for a violation of s. 316.1895(10) or 1278 s. 316.183, as enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement 1279 officer under s. 316.1896, presents documentation from the 1280 appropriate governmental entity that the notice of violation or 1281 uniform traffic citation was in error, the clerk of court or 1282 clerk to the local hearing officer may dismiss the case. The 1283 clerk of court or clerk to the local hearing officer may not 1284 charge for this service. 1285 3.âUnder a school zone speed detection system contract 1286 entered into or renewed on or after October 1, 2026, an 1287 individual may not receive a commission or per-ticket fee from 1288 any revenue collected from violations detected through the use 1289 of a speed detection system. A manufacturer or vendor may not 1290 receive a fee or remuneration based upon the number of 1291 violations detected through the use of a speed detection system. 1292 (5)(a)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2., $200 for a 1293 violation of s. 316.172(1)(a), failure to stop for a school bus. 1294 If, at a hearing, the alleged offender is found to have 1295 committed this offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil 1296 penalty of $200. In addition to this penalty, for a second or 1297 subsequent offense within a period of 5 years, the department 1298 shall suspend the driver license of the person for not less than 1299 180 days and not more than 1 year. 1300 2.âIf a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) is enforced by a 1301 school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 316.173, 1302 the penalty of $200 shall be imposed. If, at a an administrative 1303 hearing contesting a notice of violation or uniform traffic 1304 citation, the alleged offender is found to have committed this 1305 offense, a minimum civil penalty of $200 shall be imposed. 1306 Notwithstanding any other provision of law except s. 28.37(6), 1307 the civil penalties assessed under this subparagraph resulting 1308 from a notice of violation or uniform traffic citation shall be 1309 remitted to the school district at least monthly and used 1310 pursuant to s. 316.173(8). 1311 (b)1.âExcept as provided in subparagraph 2., $400 for a 1312 violation of s. 316.172(1)(b), passing a school bus on the side 1313 that children enter and exit when the school bus displays a stop 1314 signal. If, at a hearing, the alleged offender is found to have 1315 committed this offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil 1316 penalty of $400. 1317 2.âIf a violation of s. 316.172(1)(b) is enforced by a 1318 school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 316.173, 1319 the penalty under this subparagraph is a minimum of $200. If, at 1320 a hearing contesting a notice of violation or uniform traffic 1321 citation, the alleged offender is found to have committed this 1322 offense, the court shall impose a minimum civil penalty of $200. 1323 Notwithstanding any other provision of law except s. 28.37(6), 1324 the civil penalties assessed under this subparagraph resulting 1325 from notice of violation or uniform traffic citation shall be 1326 remitted to the school district at least monthly and used 1327 pursuant to s. 316.173(8). 1328 3.âIn addition to this penalty, for a second or subsequent 1329 offense within a period of 5 years, the department shall suspend 1330 the driver license of the person for not less than 360 days and 1331 not more than 2 years. 1332 (23)âIn addition to the penalty prescribed under s. 1333 316.0083, s. 316.173, or s. 316.1896 for violations enforced 1334 under those sections s. 316.0083 which are upheld by the local 1335 hearing officer, the local hearing officer may also order the 1336 payment of county, or municipal, or school district costs, not 1337 to exceed $250. 1338 Section 15.âSubsection (12) of section 320.02, Florida 1339 Statutes, is amended to read: 1340 320.02âRegistration required; application for registration; 1341 forms.â 1342 (12)âThe department is authorized to withhold registration 1343 or reregistration of any motor vehicle if the owner, or one of 1344 the co-owners of the vehicle:, 1345 (a)âHas a driver license which is under suspension for the 1346 failure to remit payment of any fines levied in this state 1347 pursuant to chapter 318 or chapter 322; or 1348 (b)âReceived a traffic citation for a violation of s. 1349 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1., s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b), or s. 1350 316.1895(10), as enforced by s. 316.0083, s. 316.173, or s. 1351 316.1896, respectively, and did not request a hearing, submit an 1352 affidavit claiming an exception, or pay the traffic citation. 1353 Section 16.âParagraph (d) of subsection (3) of section 1354 322.27, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1355 322.27âAuthority of department to suspend or revoke driver 1356 license or identification card.â 1357 (3)âThere is established a point system for evaluation of 1358 convictions of violations of motor vehicle laws or ordinances, 1359 and violations of applicable provisions of s. 403.413(6)(b) when 1360 such violations involve the use of motor vehicles, for the 1361 determination of the continuing qualification of any person to 1362 operate a motor vehicle. The department is authorized to suspend 1363 the license of any person upon showing of its records or other 1364 good and sufficient evidence that the licensee has been 1365 convicted of violation of motor vehicle laws or ordinances, or 1366 applicable provisions of s. 403.413(6)(b), amounting to 12 or 1367 more points as determined by the point system. The suspension 1368 shall be for a period of not more than 1 year. 1369 (d)âThe point system shall have as its basic element a 1370 graduated scale of points assigning relative values to 1371 convictions of the following violations: 1372 1.âReckless driving, willful and wantonâ4 points. 1373 2.âLeaving the scene of a crash resulting in property 1374 damage of more than $50â6 points. 1375 3.âUnlawful speed, or unlawful use of a wireless 1376 communications device, resulting in a crashâ6 points. 1377 4.âPassing a stopped school bus: 1378 a.âNot causing or resulting in serious bodily injury to or 1379 death of anotherâ4 points. 1380 b.âCausing or resulting in serious bodily injury to or 1381 death of anotherâ6 points. 1382 c.âPoints may not be imposed for a violation of passing a 1383 stopped school bus as provided in s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b) when 1384 enforced by a school bus infraction detection system pursuant to 1385 s. 316.173. In addition, a violation of s. 316.172(1)(a) or (b) 1386 when enforced by a school bus infraction detection system 1387 pursuant to s. 316.173 may not be used for purposes of setting 1388 motor vehicle insurance rates and is not admissible as character 1389 evidence under s. 90.404. 1390 5.âUnlawful speed: 1391 a.âNot in excess of 15 miles per hour of lawful or posted 1392 speedâ3 points. 1393 b.âIn excess of 15 miles per hour of lawful or posted 1394 speedâ4 points. 1395 c.âPoints may not be imposed for a violation of unlawful 1396 speed as provided in s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 when enforced by 1397 a traffic infraction enforcement officer pursuant to s. 1398 316.1896. In addition, a violation of s. 316.1895 or s. 316.183 1399 when enforced by a traffic infraction enforcement officer 1400 pursuant to s. 316.1896 may not be used for purposes of setting 1401 motor vehicle insurance rates and is not admissible as character 1402 evidence under s. 90.404. 1403 6.âA violation of a traffic control signal device as 1404 provided in s. 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1.â4 points. 1405 However, points may not be imposed for a violation of s. 1406 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver has failed to 1407 stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by a traffic 1408 infraction enforcement officer. In addition, a violation of s. 1409 316.074(1) or s. 316.075(1)(c)1. when a driver has failed to 1410 stop at a traffic signal and when enforced by a traffic 1411 infraction enforcement officer may not be used for purposes of 1412 setting motor vehicle insurance rates and is not admissible as 1413 character evidence under s. 90.404. 1414 7.âUnlawfully driving a vehicle through a railroad-highway 1415 grade crossingâ6 points. 1416 8.âAll other moving violations (including parking on a 1417 highway outside the limits of a municipality)â3 points. However, 1418 points may not be imposed for a violation of s. 316.2065(11); 1419 and points may be imposed for a violation of s. 316.1001 only 1420 when imposed by the court after a hearing pursuant to s. 1421 318.14(5). 1422 9.âAny moving violation covered in this paragraph, 1423 excluding unlawful speed and unlawful use of a wireless 1424 communications device, resulting in a crashâ4 points. 1425 10.âAny conviction under s. 403.413(6)(b)â3 points. 1426 11.âAny conviction under s. 316.0775(2)â4 points. 1427 12.âA moving violation covered in this paragraph which is 1428 committed in conjunction with the unlawful use of a wireless 1429 communications device within a school safety zoneâ2 points, in 1430 addition to the points assigned for the moving violation. 1431 Section 17.âSubsection (23) is added to section 775.15, 1432 Florida Statutes, to read: 1433 775.15âTime limitations; general time limitations; 1434 exceptions.â 1435 (23)âFor a traffic violation enforced pursuant to s. 1436 316.0083, s. 316.173, or s. 316.1896, the 1-year period of 1437 limitation for a noncriminal violation pursuant to paragraph 1438 (2)(d) resets upon receipt by the appropriate county, 1439 municipality, or law enforcement agency of an affidavit 1440 indicating that the motor vehicle was in the care, custody, and 1441 control of another person at the time of the violation, as 1442 authorized in s. 316.0083, s. 316.173, or s. 316.1896, 1443 respectively. 1444 Section 18.âParagraph (h) of subsection (3) of section 1445 1006.21, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1446 1006.21âDuties of district school superintendent and 1447 district school board regarding transportation.â 1448 (3)âDistrict school boards, after considering 1449 recommendations of the district school superintendent: 1450 (h)âUpon an affirmative vote of the school board 1451 authorizing the use of school bus infraction detection systems, 1452 may install and operate, or enter into an agreement with a 1453 private vendor or manufacturer to install, operate, and maintain 1454 provide, a school bus infraction detection system pursuant to s. 1455 316.173. 1456 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1457 made by this act to section 318.18, Florida Statutes, in a 1458 reference thereto, section 318.121, Florida Statutes, is 1459 reenacted to read: 1460 318.121âPreemption of additional fees, fines, surcharges, 1461 and costs.âNotwithstanding any general or special law, or 1462 municipal or county ordinance, additional fees, fines, 1463 surcharges, or costs other than the court costs and surcharges 1464 assessed under s. 318.18(12), (14), (19), (20), and (23) may not 1465 be added to the civil traffic penalties assessed under this 1466 chapter. 1467 Section 20.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.